District of Columbia statutes.
2-707

Authorized uses of official mail by elected officials.

The provisions of § 2-706 do not prohibit an elected official or his or her staff from mailing, as official mail, any of the following:

(1)

The whole or part of any record, speech, debate, or report of the Council or any committee thereof;

(2)

The tabulation of an official’s vote or explanation thereof;

(3)

Matter which expresses condolences to a person who has suffered a loss or congratulations to a person who has achieved some personal or public distinction; provided, that mass mailings of a congratulatory nature which are substantially the same except for individualized addresses are not authorized;

(4)

Information concerning the official’s schedule of meeting constituents;

(5)

Information concerning the meeting schedule and agenda for committees and subcommittees upon which the official serves;

(6)

Information concerning financial disclosure information, whether or not required by law;

(7)

Matter which consists of federal, state, or local laws, regulations or publications paid for by public funds;

(8)

Questionnaires which relate to matters respecting public policy or administration; and

(9)

Matter which contains pictures of the member or biographical or autobiographical data whenever such matter is mailed in response to a specific request therefor.

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-118, § 8, 23 DCR 8746

History

This section is referenced in § 2-704 and § 2-706.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-1707.
1973 Ed., § 1-1707.

Prior Codifications